District of Columbia statutes.
34-1202

Repealed

Definitions; rules of construction.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 3, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, §§ 2(a)-(h), 3 (2)-(4), 30 DCR 4289
June 1, 1984, D.C. Law 5-85, § 2(b), 31 DCR 1864
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, §§ 2(a), 3(a), 43 DCR 4702
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 46(a), 44 DCR 1271
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 205, 47 DCR 1091
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1802.